Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.137

Collection of overpayments—Department may issue subpoenas.

The department may issue subpoenas to compel the statement of witnesses and the production of any books, records, or documents necessary or relevant to the department's administration of duties under this chapter. It is unlawful for any person or entity, without just cause, to fail to comply with any subpoena issued under this section.

[ 1996 c 56 s 3.]